dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX BN Y 80
SFX BN ти л .
SFX BN ти ла .
SFX BN ти ло .
SFX BN ти ли .
SFX BN зати жу .
SFX BN зати жем .
SFX BN зати жеш .
SFX BN зати же .
SFX BN зати жемо .
SFX BN зати жете .
SFX BN зати жут .
SFX BN ти х .
SFX BN ти ше .
SFX BN ти хмо .
SFX BN ти сте .
SFX BN ти ху .
SFX BN зати жи .
SFX BN зати жимо .
SFX BN зати жите .
SFX BN зати жучи .
SFX BN зати жучего .
SFX BN зати жучему .
SFX BN зати жучим .
SFX BN зати жучем .
SFX BN зати жучих .
SFX BN зати жучими .
SFX BN зати жуча .
SFX BN зати жучу .
SFX BN зати жучеј .
SFX BN зати жучеју .
SFX BN зати жуче .
SFX BN зати жемы .
SFX BN зати жемого .
SFX BN зати жемому .
SFX BN зати жемым .
SFX BN зати жемом .
SFX BN зати жемо .
SFX BN зати жема .
SFX BN зати жему .
SFX BN зати жемој .
SFX BN зати жемоју .
SFX BN зати жеми .
SFX BN зати жеме .
SFX BN зати жемых .
SFX BN зати жемым .
SFX BN зати жемыми .
SFX BN ти вши .
SFX BN ти вшего .
SFX BN ти вшему .
SFX BN ти вшим .
SFX BN ти вшем .
SFX BN ти вших .
SFX BN ти вшими .
SFX BN ти вша .
SFX BN ти вшу .
SFX BN ти вшеј .
SFX BN ти вшеју .
SFX BN ти вше .
SFX BN ти ны .
SFX BN ти ного .
SFX BN ти ному .
SFX BN ти ным .
SFX BN ти ном .
SFX BN ти ни .
SFX BN ти не .
SFX BN ти ных .
SFX BN ти ными .
SFX BN ти на .
SFX BN ти ну .
SFX BN ти ној .
SFX BN ти ноју .
SFX BN ти но .
SFX BN ти нје/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нја/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нју/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX BN ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX BN ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX BO Y 4
SFX BO обє ебе .
SFX BO обє е .
SFX BO обє и .
SFX BO є оју .

SFX BP Y 4
SFX BP и ебе .
SFX BP и е .
SFX BP и обє .
SFX BP и обоју .

SFX BQ Y 62
SFX BQ ти л .
SFX BQ ти ла .
SFX BQ ти ло .
SFX BQ ти ли .
SFX BQ ти ју .
SFX BQ ти јем .
SFX BQ ти јеш .
SFX BQ ти је .
SFX BQ ти јемо .
SFX BQ ти јете .
SFX BQ ти јут .
SFX BQ ти х .
SFX BQ ти ше .
SFX BQ ти хмо .
SFX BQ ти сте .
SFX BQ ти ху .
SFX BQ ти ј .
SFX BQ ти јмо .
SFX BQ ти јте .
SFX BQ ти јучи .
SFX BQ ти јучего .
SFX BQ ти јучему .
SFX BQ ти јучим .
SFX BQ ти јучем .
SFX BQ ти јучих .
SFX BQ ти јучими .
SFX BQ ти јуча .
SFX BQ ти јучу .
SFX BQ ти јучеј .
SFX BQ ти јучеју .
SFX BQ ти јуче .
SFX BQ ти јемы .
SFX BQ ти јемого .
SFX BQ ти јемому .
SFX BQ ти јемым .
SFX BQ ти јемом .
SFX BQ ти јемо .
SFX BQ ти јема .
SFX BQ ти јему .
SFX BQ ти јемој .
SFX BQ ти јемоју .
SFX BQ ти јеми .
SFX BQ ти јеме .
SFX BQ ти јемых .
SFX BQ ти јемым .
SFX BQ ти јемыми .
SFX BQ ти вши .
SFX BQ ти вшего .
SFX BQ ти вшему .
SFX BQ ти вшим .
SFX BQ ти вшем .
SFX BQ ти вших .
SFX BQ ти вшими .
SFX BQ ти вша .
SFX BQ ти вшу .
SFX BQ ти вшеј .
SFX BQ ти вшеју .
SFX BQ ти вше .
SFX BQ и ы .
SFX BQ и а .
SFX BQ и о .
SFX BQ и је .

SFX BR Y 11
SFX BR 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BR 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX BR 0 ы/xPxE .
SFX BR 0 а/xPxE .
SFX BR 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX BR 0 у/xPxE .
SFX BR 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX BR 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX BR 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX BR 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX BR к че/xPxE .

SFX BS Y 18
SFX BS 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BS 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX BS ј 0 .
SFX BS ј и/xPxE .
SFX BS 0 е/xPxE .
SFX BS ј е/xPxE .
SFX BS 0 а/xPxE .
SFX BS ј ев/xPxE .
SFX BS 0 ев/xPxE .
SFX BS 0 у/xPxE .
SFX BS ј ах/xPxE .
SFX BS 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX BS ј ам/xPxE .
SFX BS 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX BS ј ем/xPxE .
SFX BS 0 ем/xPxE .
SFX BS ј ами/xPxE .
SFX BS 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX BT Y 19
SFX BT 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX BT от т/xPxE .
SFX BT от те/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 е/xPxE .
SFX BT от та/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 а/xPxE .
SFX BT от тев/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ев/xPxE .
SFX BT от ту/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 у/xPxE .
SFX BT от тах/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX BT от там/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX BT от тем/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ем/xPxE .
SFX BT от тами/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX BU Y 26
SFX BU 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BU и е/xPxE .
SFX BU и а/xPxE .
SFX BU и его/xBxPxE .
SFX BU и у/xPxE .
SFX BU и еј/xPxE .
SFX BU и ем/xPxE .
SFX BU и ему/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 м/xPxE .
SFX BU и еју/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 х/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX BU и ејши/zz .
SFX BU и ејшего/zz .
SFX BU и ејшему/zz .
SFX BU и ејшим/zz .
SFX BU и ејшем/zz .
SFX BU и ејше/zz .
SFX BU и ејша/zz .
SFX BU и ејшу/zz .
SFX BU и ејшеј/zz .
SFX BU и ејшеју/zz .
SFX BU и ејших/zz .
SFX BU и ејшим/zz .
SFX BU и ејшими/zz .
SFX BU и еје/zz .

SFX BV Y 68
SFX BV ти л .
SFX BV ти ла .
SFX BV ти ло .
SFX BV ти ли .
SFX BV єти ју .
SFX BV єти им .
SFX BV єти иш .
SFX BV єти и .
SFX BV єти имо .
SFX BV єти ите .
SFX BV єти ет .
SFX BV ти х .
SFX BV ти ше .
SFX BV ти хмо .
SFX BV ти сте .
SFX BV ти ху .
SFX BV єти ечи .
SFX BV єти еча .
SFX BV єти ече .
SFX BV єти имы .
SFX BV єти имого .
SFX BV єти имому .
SFX BV єти имым .
SFX BV єти имом .
SFX BV єти имо .
SFX BV єти има .
SFX BV єти иму .
SFX BV єти имој .
SFX BV єти имоју .
SFX BV єти ими .
SFX BV єти име .
SFX BV єти имых .
SFX BV єти имым .
SFX BV єти имыми .
SFX BV ти вши .
SFX BV ти вшего .
SFX BV ти вшему .
SFX BV ти вшим .
SFX BV ти вшем .
SFX BV ти вших .
SFX BV ти вшими .
SFX BV ти вша .
SFX BV ти вшу .
SFX BV ти вшеј .
SFX BV ти вшеју .
SFX BV ти вше .
SFX BV ти ны .
SFX BV ти ного .
SFX BV ти ному .
SFX BV ти ным .
SFX BV ти ном .
SFX BV ти ни .
SFX BV ти не .
SFX BV ти ных .
SFX BV ти ными .
SFX BV ти на .
SFX BV ти ну .
SFX BV ти ној .
SFX BV ти ноју .
SFX BV ти но .
SFX BV ти нје/xPxE .
SFX BV ти нја/xPxE .
SFX BV ти нју/xPxE .
SFX BV ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX BV ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX BV ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX BV ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX BV ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX BW Y 11
SFX BW 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX BW 0 ы/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 а/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 у/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX BW х ше/xPxE .

SFX BX Y 28
SFX BX 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BX ы о/xBxPxE .
SFX BX ы а/xPxE .
SFX BX ы ого/xPxE .
SFX BX ы у/xPxE .
SFX BX ы ој/xPxE .
SFX BX ы ом/xPxE .
SFX BX ы ому/xPxE .
SFX BX 0 м/xPxE .
SFX BX ы оју/xPxE .
SFX BX ы и/xPxE .
SFX BX ы е/xPxE .
SFX BX 0 х/xPxE .
SFX BX 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX BX окы ши/zz .
SFX BX окы шего/zz .
SFX BX окы шему/zz .
SFX BX окы шим/zz .
SFX BX окы шем/zz .
SFX BX окы ше/zz .
SFX BX окы ша/zz .
SFX BX окы шу/zz .
SFX BX окы шеј/zz .
SFX BX окы шеју/zz .
SFX BX окы ших/zz .
SFX BX окы шим/zz .
SFX BX окы шими/zz .
SFX BX сокы ше/xPxE .

SFX BY Y 31
SFX BY ти л .
SFX BY ти ла .
SFX BY ти ло .
SFX BY ти ли .
SFX BY єти ају .
SFX BY єти ајем .
SFX BY єти ајеш .
SFX BY єти аје .
SFX BY єти ајемо .
SFX BY єти ајете .
SFX BY єти ајут .
SFX BY ти х .
SFX BY ти ше .
SFX BY ти хмо .
SFX BY ти сте .
SFX BY ти ху .
SFX BY єти ај .
SFX BY єти ајмо .
SFX BY єти ајте .
SFX BY єти ајучи .
SFX BY єти ајуча .
SFX BY єти ајуче .
SFX BY єти ајемы .
SFX BY єти ајема .
SFX BY ти вши .
SFX BY ти вша .
SFX BY ти вше .
SFX BY ти ны .
SFX BY ти на .
SFX BY ти но .
SFX BY ти нје .

SFX BZ Y 31
SFX BZ ти л .
SFX BZ ти ла .
SFX BZ ти ло .
SFX BZ ти ли .
SFX BZ ти ју .
SFX BZ ти јем .
SFX BZ ти јеш .
SFX BZ ти је .
SFX BZ ти јемо .
SFX BZ ти јете .
SFX BZ ти јут .
SFX BZ ти х .
SFX BZ ти ше .
SFX BZ ти хмо .
SFX BZ ти сте .
SFX BZ ти ху .
SFX BZ ти ј .
SFX BZ ти јмо .
SFX BZ ти јте .
SFX BZ ти јучи .
SFX BZ ти јуча .
SFX BZ ти јуче .
SFX BZ ти јемы .
SFX BZ ти јема .
SFX BZ ти вши .
SFX BZ ти вша .
SFX BZ ти вше .
SFX BZ ти ны .
SFX BZ ти на .
SFX BZ ти но .
SFX BZ ти нје .

SFX Ba Y 28
SFX Ba 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ba ы о/xBxPxE .
SFX Ba ы а/xPxE .
SFX Ba ы ого/xPxE .
SFX Ba ы у/xPxE .
SFX Ba ы ој/xPxE .
SFX Ba ы ом/xPxE .
SFX Ba ы ому/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Ba ы оју/xPxE .
SFX Ba ы и/xPxE .
SFX Ba ы е/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 х/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX Ba гы жєјши/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјшего/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјшему/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјшим/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјшем/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјше/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјша/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјшу/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјшеј/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјшеју/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјших/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјшим/zz .
SFX Ba гы жєјшими/zz .
SFX Ba гы жеје/zz .

SFX Bb Y 11
SFX Bb 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Bb 0 и/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Bb 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX Bb х ше/xPxE .
